Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.940

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 288.

Except for RCW 41.59.040, 41.59.050, 41.59.110 and 41.59.160 which shall take effect ninety days following enactment hereof, this chapter and RCW * 28A.150.060 and 28A.405.100 as amended by chapter 288, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall take effect on January 1, 1976. Where the term "effective date of this chapter" is used elsewhere in this chapter it shall mean January 1, 1976.

[ 1990 c 33 s 572; 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 26.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28A.150.060 was repealed by 2009 c 548 s 710, effective September 1, 2011.

(2) Engrossed Substitute Senate Bill No. 2500, which is chapter 288, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess., was passed by the senate May 28, 1975, passed by the house of representatives June 2, 1975, and approved by the governor July 2, 1975, with the exception of section 4 thereof, which was vetoed by the governor; it includes the repeal of chapter 28A.72 RCW in section 28 thereof.

(3) RCW 41.59.040 and 41.59.050 were repealed by 1979 ex.s. c 146 s 3.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.